Idaho, session 2026, H0585.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 10, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-1004A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-1004A. INSPECTIONS -- TIMELINESS -- REFUNDS. (1) If an inspection
requested by a permit holder is not performed within forty-eight (48) busi-
ness hours, such permit holder shall be authorized to hire a third-party in-
spector to perform such inspection. The permit holder or third-party in-
spector shall notify the division or local government that such inspection
is being completed by a third-party inspector. The permit holder shall pro-
vide a copy of the results of the completed inspection to the division or lo-
cal government. A permit holder who obtains a third-party inspection under
this section shall be refunded any fee, or portion thereof, that the permit
holder paid to the division or local government for such inspection. If a lo-
cal government contracts with and pays the division, county, or third party
for an inspection that requires a refund pursuant to this section, the divi-
sion, county, or third party shall be responsible for refunding the permit
holder.
(2) The division or a local government shall refund ten percent (10%) of
the fees, or the portion thereof, paid by a permit holder for an inspection if
an inspector or electrical code administrator:
(a) Conducts an inspection on the work relating to the permit;
(b) Determines that the work has failed an inspection; and
(c) Fails to, within three (3) business days, provide the permit holder
or his agent with a reason for the failure of such inspection pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter.
(3) A third-party inspector under this section shall meet the qualifi-
cations prescribed by section 54-1019, Idaho Code, and shall conduct the in-
spection in substantial accord with the applicable jurisdiction's standards
provided by law, rule, or ordinance.


SECTION 2. That Chapter 26, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-2626A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-2626A. INSPECTIONS -- TIMELINESS -- REFUNDS. (1) If an inspection
requested by a permit holder is not performed within forty-eight (48) busi-
ness hours, such permit holder shall be authorized to hire a third-party in-
spector to perform such inspection. The permit holder or third-party in-
spector shall notify the division or local government that such inspection
is being completed by a third-party inspector. The permit holder shall pro-
vide a copy of the results of the completed inspection to the division or lo-
cal government. A permit holder who obtains a third-party inspection under
this section shall be refunded any fee, or portion thereof, that the permit
holder paid to the division or local government for such inspection. If a lo-
cal government contracts with and pays the division, county, or third party
for an inspection that requires a refund pursuant to this section, the divi-
sion, county, or third party shall be responsible for refunding the permit
holder.
(2) The division or a local government shall refund ten percent (10%) of
the fees, or the portion thereof, paid by a permit holder for an inspection if
an inspector or plumbing code administrator:
(a) Conducts an inspection on the work relating to the permit;
(b) Determines that the work has failed an inspection; and
(c) Fails to, within three (3) business days, provide the permit holder
or his agent with a reason for the failure of such inspection pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter.
(3) A third-party inspector under this section shall meet the qualifi-
cations prescribed by section 54-2627, Idaho Code, and shall conduct the in-
spection in substantial accord with the applicable jurisdiction's standards
provided by law, rule, or ordinance.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 50, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-5020A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-5020A. INSPECTIONS -- TIMELINESS -- REFUNDS. (1) If an inspection
requested by a permit holder is not performed within forty-eight (48) busi-
ness hours, such permit holder shall be authorized to hire a third-party in-
spector to perform such inspection. The permit holder or third-party in-
spector shall notify the division or local government that such inspection
is being completed by a third-party inspector. The permit holder shall pro-
vide a copy of the results of the completed inspection to the division or lo-
cal government. A permit holder who obtains a third-party inspection under
this section shall be refunded any fee, or portion thereof, that the permit
holder paid to the division or local government for such inspection. If a lo-
cal government contracts with and pays the division, county, or third party
for an inspection that requires a refund pursuant to this section, the divi-
sion, county, or third party shall be responsible for refunding the permit
holder.


(2) The division or a local government shall refund ten percent (10%) of
the fees, or the portion thereof, paid by a permit holder for an inspection if
an inspector or mechanical code administrator:
(a) Conducts an inspection on the work relating to the permit;
(b) Determines that the work has failed an inspection; and
(c) Fails to, within three (3) business days, provide the permit holder
or his agent with a reason for the failure of such inspection pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter.
(3) A third-party inspector under this section shall meet the qualifi-
cations prescribed by section 54-5021, Idaho Code, and shall conduct the in-
spection in substantial accord with the applicable jurisdiction's standards
provided by law, rule, or ordinance.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.